California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) Golden State Energy indebtedness shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any political subdivision of the state.

(b) Golden State Energy indebtedness shall be payable solely from the funds available to it.

(c) The issuance of indebtedness shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state or any other political subdivision of the state to levy or pledge any form of taxation or to make any appropriation for its repayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3444.

(a) Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 5700) of Division 6 of Title 1 of the Government Code shall not apply to any bonds or other forms of indebtedness issued for the benefit, or on behalf, of Golden State Energy.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, whenever Golden State Energy deems that it will be in the best interests of its ratepayers, it may exercise an exclusive right to select and retain, or have any conduit issuer issuing bonds or other forms of indebtedness for its benefit or on its behalf select and retain, the services of private entities, including, but not limited to, underwriters, bond counsels, tax counsels, disclosure counsels, financial advisers, bond
 insurers, or other entities providing risk management services for bonds or other forms of indebtedness issued for its benefit or on its behalf. Payment for any of these private entities may be made out of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds or other forms of indebtedness issued for the benefit, or on behalf, of Golden State Energy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3446.

While any indebtedness issued by or on behalf of Golden State Energy remains outstanding, the State of California pledges to the holders of any such indebtedness that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested in Golden State Energy to fulfill the terms of any loan agreement, lease, or other contract with the holders of such indebtedness, or in any way impair the rights or remedies of those holders or of the parties to the related loan agreement, lease, or contract. Golden State Energy may include this pledge in any instrument under which that indebtedness is incurred or issued or other documents entered into in connection with that indebtedness as a covenant for the benefit of the holders thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. Other Matters [3450. - 3558.]

3450.

The Legislature hereby ratifies and deems proper all acts by the Governor or the Governor’s designee before the effective date of this division taken in furtherance of the establishment of Golden State
 Energy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3452.

This division, being necessary for the prosperity of the state and its residents, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3454.

The acquisition of Pacific Gas and Electric Company by Golden State Energy, for any reason including pursuant to Section 713, shall not be subject to Sections 851 to 854, inclusive, if Golden State Energy, or its subsidiary, as part of such acquisition, agrees to do all of the following:

(a) Assume, take assignment of, and be bound by all collective bargaining agreements and related obligations, including pension and benefit agreements, then in effect that cover the business being acquired.

(b) Assume any obligations for funding under pension plans then in effect.

(c) In the event the transfer is made as part of Pacific Gas and
 Electric Company’s and PG&E Corporation’s bankruptcy cases pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 1101) of the United States Bankruptcy Code (Title 11 of the United States Code) (Case No. 19-30088), adopt and be bound by the terms and provisions set forth on Exhibit B to the Debtors’ and Shareholder Proponents’ Joint Chapter 11 Plan of Reorganization Dated March 16, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3558.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as diminishing or enlarging any valid existing rights under any license or franchise previously issued pursuant to federal or state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. REGULATION OF RELATED BUSINESSES BY THE PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION [3901. - 5513.]



CHAPTER 1. Interstate and Foreign Motor Carriers of Household Goods and Passengers Act [3901. - 3950.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [3901. - 3950.]

3901.

This chapter may be cited as the Interstate and Foreign Motor Carriers of Household Goods and Passengers Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 29.5.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

3902.

(a) No household goods carrier, as defined in Section 5109, shall engage in any interstate or foreign transportation of property for compensation by motor vehicle, and no motor carrier shall engage in any interstate or foreign transportation of passengers for compensation by motor vehicle, on any public highway in this state without first having registered the operation with the commission or the carrier’s base registration state, if other than California, as determined in accordance with final regulations issued by the Interstate Commerce Commission pursuant to the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991 (49 U.S.C. Sec. 11506). To register with the commission, carriers specified in this section shall comply with the following:

(1) When the operation requires authority from the Interstate Commerce Commission under the Interstate Commerce Act, or authority from another federal regulatory agency, a copy of that authority shall be filed with the initial application for registration. A copy of any additions or amendments to the authority shall be filed with the commission.

(2) If the operation does not require authority from the Interstate Commerce Commission under the Interstate Commerce Act, or authority from another federal regulatory agency, an affidavit of that exempt status shall be filed with the application for registration.

(3) The commission shall grant registration upon the filing of the application pursuant to applicable law and the payment of any applicable fees, subject to the carrier’s compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 29.5.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

3903.

Household goods carriers, as defined in Section 5109, engaged in interstate or foreign transportation or property for compensation by motor vehicle, and motor carriers engaged in interstate or foreign transportation of passengers for compensation by motor vehicle, upon any public highway in this state who had registered their authority from the Interstate Commerce Commission with the commission pursuant to former Section 3810 are not required to file another initial application as prescribed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3902.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1042, Sec. 29.5.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

3950.

It is a violation of law for any person or corporation to operate, or cause to be operated, on the highways of this state, any motor vehicle in the transportation of property or passengers for compensation in interstate commerce without having first complied with the requirements of this chapter. That violation may be prosecuted and punished as provided in Section 16560 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Enforcement of Federal Pipeline Safety Standards for Mobilehome Park Operators [4351. - 4361.]

4351.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Gas” means natural or manufactured gas, except propane, used for light, heat, or power.

(b) “Distribution system” means a system of pipes within a mobilehome park operated by a person or corporation, other than a public utility, which is connected to a meter or other measuring device under the control of a privately owned or publicly owned public utility, for purposes of distribution
 of gas by the operator of a mobilehome park to the tenants of the mobilehome park who are the actual users of the gas furnished through the meter or device to the operator by the public utility.

(c) “Operator” is a mobilehome park owner or operator who maintains and operates a master-metered natural gas distribution system.

(d) “Department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development. 

(e) “Local enforcement agency” means the city, county, or city and county which has assumed the responsibility for the enforcement of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18300) of Part 2.1 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) “Federal law” or “federal pipeline standards” means the federal Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968 (49 U.S.C. Sec.
 1671 et seq.) and the regulations contained in Parts 190, 191, and 192 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1630, Sec. 2.   This section was also added, in identical language, by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1601.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1630 (and Sec. 3 of Ch. 1601).)
-------------------------------------------

4352.

(a) The commission shall undertake a gas safety inspection and enforcement program for mobilehome parks with distribution systems to ensure compliance with the federal pipeline standards by mobilehome park operators within the state. The commission may adopt rules, which shall be at least as stringent as the federal law in order to protect the health and safety of mobilehome park residents. Nothing in this chapter prohibits the commission from adopting more stringent
 standards than those in the federal law.

(b) As part of this gas safety inspection and enforcement program, the commission inspectors may:

(1) Enter public or private property as is necessary to carry out this chapter.

(2) Enter and inspect all mobilehome parks, wherever situated, and inspect all documents (including those records listed in subdivision (a) of Section 4353), accommodations, equipment, or paraphernalia used in connection with or related to the gas distribution system of the mobilehome park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 817, Sec. 1.   Effective September 22, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4353.

(a) The commission shall conduct an initial inspection of each distribution system which shall take place on the mobilehome park premises. The inspection shall consist of all of the following:

(1) An inspection of the adequacy of the operator’s operation and maintenance plan.

(2) The information contained in the required annual report.

(3) The records of leak surveys and repairs, corrosion control, and cathodic protection of the system.

(4) If deemed appropriate from the review of the records, a physical inspection of the mobilehome park’s distribution system to ensure compliance with the federal law; the applicable sections of Commission General Order 112 relating to mobilehome park distribution systems, excluding the sections relating to gas transmission facilities, LNG facilities, and gathering lines; and any rules and orders adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter.

(b) If the operator demonstrates compliance pursuant to subdivision (a), the distribution system shall thereafter be inspected at least once every seven years pursuant to a risk-based inspection
 schedule adopted by the commission. The subsequent inspections shall consist of the elements specified in subdivision (a). However, the commission may institute an inspection at any time if it determines, following a review of a subsequent annual report or receipt of a complaint, that an additional inspection is necessary.

(c) If the operator does not demonstrate compliance pursuant to subdivision (a), the distribution system may be inspected on an annual basis until such time as there is compliance and, thereafter, shall be inspected as specified in subdivision (b).

(d) If upon the initial inspection or any subsequent inspection, the commission determines the presence of a gas leak or other safety hazard in the distribution system which poses a significant or immediate danger to the health and safety of the park residents, the distribution system may be inspected more frequently
 until the condition is corrected. Once corrected, the park shall be inspected as specified in subdivision (b).

(e) The commission may require an operator to provide necessary assistance to commission inspectors in entering and inspecting the mobilehome park, including, but not limited to:

(1) Allowing commission inspectors entry to mobilehome park premises.

(2) Having, upon notice, the necessary records specified in subdivision (a) available for the commission inspector’s review during the physical inspection.

(3) Assisting in surveying or uncovering portions of a distribution system for purposes of inspection, verification, and testing.

(f) It shall be a violation for a mobilehome park
 operator to willfully obstruct a commission inspector’s access, entry, or inspection of a mobilehome park.

(g) The commission may enforce subdivision (f) by issuing a citation in the manner specified in subdivision (b) of Section 4357 and shall notify the United States Department of Transportation, the department or local enforcement agency, the utility serving the distribution system, and the operator of any citation issued pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 4353.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 112, Sec. 1.   (AB 1694)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4354.

(a) Every operator shall prepare and submit to the commission annually a report on the distribution system.

(b) The report shall be submitted to the commission at the same time the annual application for a permit to operate the mobilehome park is submitted to the department or the local enforcement agency.

(c) The report shall be prepared using a form required by the commission and shall contain the information the commission finds necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter. In developing the form, the commission shall consult with interested parties to ensure that the form contains no more than the necessary and appropriate information to carry out the intent of this chapter.

(d) Upon receipt of the report, the commission shall examine the report for violations of (1) applicable federal pipeline safety laws or regulations or (2) any applicable commission rules or orders. The commission may inspect the operator’s distribution system for the purpose of verifying whether or not a violation of federal or state pipeline safety laws or regulations has occurred or is occurring.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1630, Sec. 2.   This section was also added, in identical language, by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1601.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1630 (and Sec. 3 of Ch. 1601), except that subd. (c) is operative January 1, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4354.5.

(a) Every operator shall maintain all of the following: 

(1) A map, drawing, or diagram which indicates the location of the distribution system’s main and service lines, master-meter, and the identity of key valves. 

(2) A copy of each annual report which has been submitted pursuant to the federal law or this chapter. 

(3) A copy of any record of leak surveys and repairs, corrosion control, and cathodic protection of the system. 

(b) The information and records listed in subdivision (a) shall be provided to any subsequent operator of the distribution system upon the sale, transfer, or other conveyance of title to the mobilehome park. 

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there shall be no penalty pursuant to Section 4357 imposed upon a subsequent operator of the distribution system who has not received the information and records listed in subdivision (a) from the transferring operator or upon any operator who fails to have the information and records for any period on or before the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 633, Sec. 1.   Effective October 8, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4355.

Except as specified in Section 4356, after each inspection, the commission shall furnish the operator, or a representative designated in writing by the operator, with a written copy of the inspection report within 30 days of the inspection, and the report shall indicate any violations of applicable federal or state pipeline safety laws or regulations. Upon receipt of a report indicating a safety violation, the operator shall file, within 30 days, a written response with the commission which acknowledges receipt of the report and specifies a
 compliance plan for correcting the safety violations, including, if appropriate, a timetable for completing necessary repairs or improvements to the distribution system. The commission shall furnish copies of inspection reports indicating safety violations, and responses to these reports, to the United States Department of Transportation and to the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1601, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1601.)
-------------------------------------------

4356.

(a) If the commission determines the presence of a gas leak or other safety hazard in the distribution system which poses a significant or immediate danger to the health and safety of the park residents, it shall notify the United States Department of Transportation, the department or local enforcement agency, the utility serving the distribution system, and the operator, who shall provide notice to the affected tenants in the park.

(b) The commission shall require the operator to take immediate steps to correct and repair the gas leak or other hazard. The park operator shall obtain permits from the department or local enforcement agency, as required by Part 2.1 (commencing with Section 18200) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code. The commission may direct the serving gas corporation to terminate service at the master meter if an operator does not comply with this requirement. The cost of repair or corrective actions shall be borne by the operator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 817, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4357.

(a) Any operator who commits a violation enumerated in subdivision (f) of Section 4353, or who fails to file the report required by Section 4354 or to comply with a directive of the commission pursuant to Section 4356 is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the violation, failure to file the report or respond to the directive continues, but not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for a single violation or related
 series of violations. The commission shall enforce this subdivision.

(b) The commission may enforce subdivision (a) in the following manner:

(1) By issuing a citation to the responsible person, as defined by Section 18603 of the Health and Safety Code, and to the mobilehome park operator. In the event of a violation that constitutes a significant or immediate danger to health and safety of the park residents, the citation shall be issued immediately and served upon the responsible person or the holder of the permit to operate the mobilehome park. The mobilehome park operator shall be responsible for the correction of any violations for which a citation has been given pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) Service of the citation shall be effected either personally or by first-class mail. Each citation shall be in writing
 and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a reference to the statutory provisions or regulations alleged to have been violated, as well as any penalty provided by law for failure to make timely correction. The citation shall fix the earliest feasible time, as determined by the commission, for the elimination of the condition constituting the alleged violation.

(3) A mobilehome park operator may request an informal conference with the commission staff to challenge any citation alleging a violation, or any directive to correct a violation. The informal conference, any subsequent hearings, or appeals of a decision of the commission shall be conducted in accordance with the rules and procedures prescribed by the commission.

(c) The remedies provided by this chapter are cumulative and shall not be construed to supersede other provisions of law
 providing sanctions for violators of this chapter, including, but not limited to, Sections 2112 and 2113 of the Public Utilities Code.

(d) Nothing in this chapter affects the tort liability of the operator of a distribution system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 817 (Sec. 4).   Effective September 22, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

4358.

(a) The commission shall establish a uniform billing per space or lot surcharge to be paid by operators with distribution systems subject to this chapter on natural gas purchased for distribution to their tenants. The surcharge shall be designed to recover the commission’s costs of the mobilehome park safety inspection and enforcement program required by this chapter. 

(b) The commission shall require gas corporations to adjust their rates on an annual basis to recover the surcharge
 specified in subdivision (a). Mobilehome parks which are served by publicly owned public utilities shall be inspected at the request of the serving utility. However, publicly owned public utilities which serve mobilehome parks subject to this chapter shall only be required to adjust their gas rates to recover the surcharge specified in subdivision (a) when a mobilehome park within the utility’s jurisdiction is inspected. 

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or local ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure, the operator shall be entitled to recover the surcharge collected pursuant to subdivision (a) from its tenants on a monthly basis. However, the charge to any tenant shall not exceed 30 cents per month for the period from July 1, 1991, until July 1, 1992, and shall not exceed 25 cents per month after that date. If the commission establishes the surcharge at a lesser amount, the operator’s recovery shall not exceed the
 actual surcharge. 

(d) All surcharge fees collected by gas corporations pursuant to this section shall be forwarded to the commission, as required by the commission. All surcharge fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Public Utilities Commission Utilities Reimbursement Account in the General Fund, which fees shall be used, upon appropriation, for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.   Effective October 8, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4359.

The commission may adopt rules and orders to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1601, Sec. 2.   Operative January 1, 1991, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1601.)
-------------------------------------------

4360.

Nothing in this chapter affects the requirement that operators of liquefied petroleum gas (propane) master-meter systems supplying 10 or more customers from a single source comply with the applicable provisions of the federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1630, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1630.)
-------------------------------------------

4361.

(a) In each mobilehome park, the operator shall post on the mobilehome park premises the current emergency telephone numbers for, at a minimum, the gas company, the fire department, and the responsible person as defined by Section 18603 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall maintain on the mobilehome park premises an emergency procedure, which shall be used in the event there is a gas leak or other safety hazard in the gas distribution system. The operator is required to inform each of the tenants of the mobilehome park of the
 location of these emergency telephone numbers and the emergency procedure.

(b) Any operator who fails to comply with subdivision (a) shall be subject to the same penalty as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 4357. The commission shall enforce this subdivision pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4357.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 817, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.1. Enforcement of Federal Pipeline Safety Standards for Propane Operators [4451. - 4465.]

4451.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Supplier” means a person or corporation, other than a public utility, who sells propane and arranges for its delivery to the operator’s tank.

(b) “Distribution system” means a system of pipes, operated by a person or corporation other than a public utility, serving 10 or more customers, within a citywide area, an apartment house, a condominium, a cluster of homes, a shopping center, a combination of any of the above, a mobilehome park with two or more customers, or any system if a portion of the system is located in a public place, which is connected to a tank or tanks, for the purpose of distribution of propane to the end customers.

(c) “Operator” means the owner of the mobilehome park or the distribution system, or the designated responsible employee, manager, or legal representative.

(d) “Tank” means a vessel for the storage and distribution of propane.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(f) “Local enforcement agency” means the city, county, or city and county that has assumed the responsibility for the enforcement of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18300) of Part 2.1 of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) “Federal law” or “federal pipeline standards” means the Federal Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968 (49 U.S.C. Sec. 1671 et seq.) and the regulations contained in Parts 190, 191, and 192 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(h) “Propane” means propane gas, also known as liquid petroleum gas or LPG.

(i) “NFPA 58” means National Fire Protection Association Standard number 58, which covers rules and standards for propane service. The Legislature finds and declares that NFPA 58 is overseen by a national committee that ensures that the standard incorporates the latest in current and approved technology.

(j) “Commission” means the Public Utilities Commission.

(k) “General Order (or GO) 112” means the commission’s general order that sets out rules governing design, construction, testing, maintenance, and operation of utility gas gathering, transmission, and distribution piping systems. GO 112 incorporates, by reference, all the pertinent federal laws defined in subdivision (g).

(l) “Public place” means any system supplying two or more customers where any portion is under a public right of way.

(m) “Trust fund” means the propane safety inspection and enforcement trust fund established pursuant to Section 4462.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 651, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4452.

(a) On or before July 1, 1995, the commission shall undertake a propane safety inspection and enforcement program for propane distribution systems to ensure compliance with the federal pipeline standards by propane operators within the state. The commission may adopt rules, which shall be at least as stringent as the federal law, in order to protect the health and safety of customers served by propane distribution systems. Nothing in this chapter prohibits the commission from adopting more stringent standards than those in the federal pipeline standards.

(b) As part of this propane safety inspection and enforcement program, the commission inspectors may:

(1) Enter public or private property as is necessary to carry out this chapter.

(2) Enter and inspect all propane distribution systems, wherever situated, and inspect all documents (including those records listed in subdivision (a) of Section 4453), accommodations, equipment, or paraphernalia used in connection with or related to the distribution system.

(c) The commission’s propane safety inspection and enforcement program shall not cover propane used by any of the following:

(1) Single customers served by single tanks.

(2) Distribution systems, other than mobilehome parks, that serve less than 10 customers, unless any portion of the system is located in a public place.

(3) Recreational vehicles and appliances.

(4) Vehicular fuel.

(5) Agricultural, commercial serving less than 10 customers, unless a portion of the system is located in a public place, industrial, and refinery systems.

(6) Cylinder exchange operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 651, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4453.

(a) The commission shall conduct an initial inspection of each distribution system which shall take place on the premises. The inspection shall determine if the distribution system falls under the commission’s safety program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 4452. If it is determined that it does not, then the inspection shall be terminated immediately. Otherwise, the inspection, and all followup inspections, shall consist of all of the following:

(1) A review of the adequacy of the operator’s operation and maintenance plan, emergency plan, and system map or maps.

(2) Evaluation of the information contained in the required annual report.

(3) A review of the records of leak surveys and repairs, corrosion control, and cathodic protection of the system.

(4) If deemed appropriate from the review of the records, a physical inspection of the propane distribution system to ensure compliance with the federal law, the applicable sections of General Order 112 relating to the distribution system, NFPA 58, and any rules and orders adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter.

(b) If the operator demonstrates compliance pursuant to subdivision (a), the distribution system shall thereafter be inspected at least once every seven years pursuant to a risk-based inspection
 schedule adopted by the commission. The subsequent inspections shall consist of the elements specified in subdivision (a). However, the commission may institute an inspection for a distribution system of any size, at any time, if it determines, following a review of a subsequent annual report or receipt of a complaint, that an additional inspection is necessary.

(c) If the operator does not demonstrate compliance pursuant to subdivision (a), the distribution system may be inspected on an annual basis until such time as there is compliance, and thereafter, shall be inspected as specified in subdivision (b).

(d) If upon the initial inspection or any subsequent inspection, the commission determines the presence of a propane leak or other safety hazard in the distribution system that poses
 a significant or
 immediate danger to the health and safety of the customers, the distribution system may be inspected more frequently until the condition is corrected. Once corrected, the distribution system shall be inspected as specified in subdivision (b).

(e) The commission may require an operator to provide necessary assistance to commission inspectors in entering and inspecting the distribution systems, including, but not limited to:

(1) Allowing commission inspectors entry to the premises.

(2) Having, upon notice, the necessary records specified in subdivision (a) available for the commission inspector’s review during the physical inspection.

(3) Assisting
 in surveying or uncovering portions of the distribution systems for purposes of inspection, verification, and testing.

(f) It shall be a violation for an operator to willfully obstruct a commission inspector’s access, entry, or inspection of a distribution system or to remove a warning tag placed on the operator’s tank by a commission inspector pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4456.

(g) The commission may enforce subdivision (f) by issuing a citation in the manner specified in subdivision (b) of Section 4457, and shall notify the department or local enforcement agency, the supplier serving the distribution system, the State Fire Marshal, local fire districts, and the operator of any citation issued pursuant to this subdivision.

(h) If the commission determined, upon inspection or a receipt of a complaint or disclosure, that a distribution system pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 4452 is serving more than nine customers, or if any portion of the system is located in a public place, then the distribution system shall be subject to the commission’s safety program as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 112, Sec. 2.   (AB 1694)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4454.

(a) Every operator of a system serving 10 or more units or where any portion of the system is located in a public place, with the exception of mobilehome parks operators, shall prepare and submit to the commission annually a report on the distribution system. The report shall be submitted by March 31 of each year and shall cover the previous calendar year.

(b) In the case of mobilehome parks, the report shall be submitted to the commission at the same time the annual application for a permit to operate the mobilehome park is submitted to the department or the local enforcement agency.

(c) The report shall be prepared using a form or forms required by the commission, and shall contain the information the commission finds necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter. In developing the form or forms, the commission shall consult with interested parties to ensure that the form contains no more than the necessary and appropriate information to carry out the intent of this chapter.

(d) Upon receipt of the report, the commission shall examine the report for violations of either applicable federal pipeline safety laws or regulations or any applicable commission rules or orders. The commission may inspect the operator’s distribution system for the purpose of verifying whether or not a violation of federal or state pipeline safety laws or regulations, or NFPA 58 rules, has occurred or is occurring.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 651, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4454.5.

(a) Every operator shall maintain all of the following:

(1) A map, drawing, or diagram that indicates the location of the distribution system’s main and service lines, tank (or tanks), regulators, the identity and location of key valves, and the identity of the supplier.

(2) A copy of each annual report that has been submitted pursuant to the federal law or this chapter.

(3) A copy of any record of leak surveys and repairs, corrosion control, and cathodic protection of the system.

(4) An operation and maintenance plan, and an emergency plan.

(b) The information and records listed in subdivision (a) shall be provided to any subsequent operator of the distribution system upon the sale, transfer, or other conveyance of title to the distribution system.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there shall be no penalty pursuant to Section 4457 imposed upon a subsequent operator of the distribution system who has not received the information and records listed in subdivision (a) from the transferring operator or upon any operator who fails to have the information and records for any period on or before the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4455.

Except as specified in Section 4456, after each inspection, the commission shall furnish the operator, or a representative designated in writing by the operator, with a written copy of the inspection report within 30 days of the inspection. The report shall indicate any violations of applicable federal or state pipeline safety regulations. The operator shall then file, within 30 days, a written response with the commission that acknowledges receipt of the report and specifies a compliance plan for correcting the safety violations, including, if appropriate, a timetable for completing necessary repairs or improvements to the distribution system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4456.

(a) If the commission determines the presence of a propane leak or other safety hazard in the distribution system, which poses a significant or immediate danger to the health and safety of the distribution system’s customers, it shall notify the supplier serving the distribution system; the operator, who shall provide notice to the affected customers; and local authorities, as deemed necessary.

(b) The commission shall require the operator to take immediate steps to correct and repair the propane leak or other hazard. The operator of a mobilehome park shall obtain permits from the department or local enforcement agency, as required by Part 2.1 (commencing with Section 18200) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code. Other operators shall obtain permits from local agencies, such as the county or fire district. The commission may place a warning tag on the tank, may direct the serving supplier to terminate service to the tank, and may direct other local suppliers not to serve the tank, if an operator does not comply with this requirement. The cost of repair or corrective action shall be borne by the operator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 651, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4457.

(a) Any operator who commits a violation enumerated in subdivision (f) of Section 4453 or who fails to file the report required by Section 4454 or fails to comply with a directive of the commission pursuant to Section 4456 is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day that the violation, or failure to file the report or respond to the directive continues, but not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for a single violation or related series of violations. The commission shall enforce this subdivision.

(b) The commission may enforce subdivision (a) in the following manner:
